Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 7. Removal of Public Officers from Office.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Clerks of Court, § 3; 4A M.J. Commonwealth’s and State’s Attorney, § 9; 5A M.J. Counties, § 21; 13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 85; 15 M.J. Public Officers, §§ 31, 33, 34, 37; 18 M.J. Taxation, § 40.

§ 24.2-230.
Applicability of article; certain exceptions.

This article shall apply to all elected or appointed Commonwealth, constitutional, and local officers, except officers for whose removal the Constitution of Virginia specifically provides.

However, an appointed officer shall be removed from office only by the person or authority who appointed him unless he is sentenced for a crime as provided for in §

24.2-231

or is determined to be “mentally incompetent” as provided for in §

24.2-232

. This exception shall not apply to an officer who is (i) appointed to fill a vacancy in an elective office or (ii) appointed to an office for a term established by law and the appointing person or authority is not given the unqualified power of removal.

This article shall be applicable to members of local electoral boards and general registrars, but shall not be applicable to deputy registrars who may be removed from office by the general registrar pursuant to §

24.2-112

or to officers of election who may be removed from office by the local electoral board pursuant to §

24.2-109

.

History.

1975, cc. 515, 595, §§ 24.1-79.1, 24.1-79.2; 1993, c. 641; 1998, c. 582; 2004, cc. 27, 391; 2022, c. 140.

Cross references.

As to applicability of this article to the board of directors of the Virginia Commercial Space Flight Authority, see §

2.2-2203

.

As to removal of judges, see § 17.2-900 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 27 and 391, cl. 2 provides: “That the terms of office of general registrars serving on the effective date of this act shall be extended to midnight June 30, 2007.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 27 and 391 are identical, and added the last paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “deputy” for “assistant” in the last paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Fort Monroe Authority Board of Trustees members hold public office. —

Because there is no available exemption to the prohibitions of Article VII, § 6 of the Constitution of Virginia and §

15.2-1535

, neither the Mayor, Vice Mayor, nor any other city council member may be appointed by the city council to serve as a member of the Fort Monroe Authority Board. Members of the Fort Monroe Authority Board, as individuals holding public office, stand in a fiduciary relationship with the authority and thus are subject to the common-law duties of loyalty, care, obedience, and disclosure that are generally applicable to those in such a fiduciary relationship. A board member who fails to fulfill his lawful duties may be removed from office in accordance with the board’s bylaws and applicable law. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable S. Chris Jones, Member, House of Delegates, 13-009, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 23 (4/12/13).

Removal of local elected officers. —

Charter that allows the town council to expel a member by a two-thirds vote, is a constitutional exercise of legislative power. Sections

24.2-230

through

24.2-238

, which relate to the removal of local elected officers, do not supersede this provision of the charter. Further, the mayor may not vote in expulsion proceedings, and the concurrence of two-thirds of all council members eligible to vote is required in order to remove a council member. See opinion of Attorney General to Martin Crim, Esquire, Town Attorney for the Town of Haymarket, No. 13-112,
(7/18/14).

§ 24.2-231.
Forfeiture of office by person sentenced for commission of certain crimes.

Any person holding any public office of honor, profit, or trust in this Commonwealth who is convicted of a felony or any offense for which registration is required as defined in §

9.1-902

and for whom all rights of appeal under Virginia law have expired, shall by such final conviction forfeit his office or post and thereafter may not act therein under his previous election or appointment. A pardon which may be afterwards granted him shall not void the forfeiture.

History.

Code 1950, § 2.1-36; 1966, c. 677; 1975, cc. 515, 595, § 24.1-79.3; 1993, c. 641; 2007, c. 175.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 175 inserted “or any offense for which registration is required as defined in §

9.1-902

” and substituted “under Virginia law have expired” for “have terminated.”

§ 24.2-232.
Vacancy occurring when officer determined “mentally incompetent” (incapacitated).

A person who is determined to be incapacitated in a judicial proceeding as provided for in Chapter 20 (§

64.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 64.2 shall be deemed for purposes of Article II, Section 1 of the Constitution of Virginia and this title to be “mentally incompetent” as that term is used in those provisions. The office of any person who is so determined to be incapacitated, shall become vacant and the vacancy filled in the manner provided by law. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 20 (§

64.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 64.2, however, any officer shall have a jury trial unless it is waived by him or for him by his counsel of record.

History.

1975, cc. 515, 595, § 24.1-79.4; 1993, c. 641; 1997, c. 921; 1998, c. 582.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the two references to “Chapter 10 (§

37.2-1000

et seq.) of Title 37.2” were changed to “Chapter 20 (§

64.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 64.2” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 and Chapter 10 of Title 37.2 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 24.2-233.
(Effective until January 1, 2024) Removal of elected and certain appointed officers by courts.

Upon petition, a circuit court may remove from office any elected officer or officer who has been appointed to fill an elective office, residing within the jurisdiction of the court:

For neglect of duty, misuse of office, or incompetence in the performance of duties when that neglect of duty, misuse of office, or incompetence in the performance of duties has a material adverse effect upon the conduct of the office;

Upon conviction of a misdemeanor pursuant to Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) or Article 1.1 (§

18.2-265.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 and after all rights of appeal have terminated involving the:

Manufacture, sale, gift, distribution, or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, give, or distribute a controlled substance or marijuana;

Sale, possession with intent to sell, or placing an advertisement for the purpose of selling drug paraphernalia; or

Possession of any controlled substance or marijuana and such conviction under subdivision a, b, or c has a material adverse effect upon the conduct of such office;

Upon conviction, and after all rights of appeal have terminated, of a misdemeanor involving a “hate crime” as that term is defined in §

52-8.5

when the conviction has a material adverse effect upon the conduct of such office; or

Upon conviction, and after all rights of appeal have terminated, of sexual battery in violation of §

18.2-67.4

, attempted sexual battery in violation of subsection C of §

18.2-67.5

, peeping or spying into dwelling or enclosure in violation of §

18.2-130

, consensual sexual intercourse with a child 15 years of age or older in violation of §

18.2-371

, or indecent exposure of himself or procuring another to expose himself in violation of §

18.2-387

, and such conviction has a material adverse effect upon the conduct of such office.The petition must be signed by a number of registered voters who reside within the jurisdiction of the officer equal to ten percent of the total number of votes cast at the last election for the office that the officer holds.Any person removed from office under the provisions of subdivision 2, 3, or 4 may not be subsequently subject to the provisions of this section for the same criminal offense.

History.

1975, cc. 515, 595, § 24.1-79.5; 1989, c. 470; 1993, c. 641; 2002, cc. 588, 623; 2011, cc. 384, 410; 2014, cc. 566, 674, 719.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2024. For the version of this section effective January 1, 2024, see the following section, also numbered
§

24.2-233

.

Cross references.

As to punishment for misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by cc. 588 and 623 are identical, and substituted “ ‘hate crime’ ” for “ ‘terrorist act’ ” in subdivision 3; and substituted “that” for “which” in the next-to-last paragraph.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 384 and 410, effective March 23, 2011, are identical, and inserted “synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” and made a related change in subdivisions 2 a and 2 c.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 566 added subdivision 4 and made related changes.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 674 and 719 are identical, and deleted “synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” following “marijuana” in subdivisions 2 a and 2 c; in subdivision 2 c inserted “subdivision”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 4 provides: “4. That, except as provided in the fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth, ninth, tenth, elev- enth, twelfth, thirteenth, fourteenth, fifteenth, sixteenth, seventeenth, eighteenth, nineteenth, twentieth, twenty-first, twenty-second, twenty- third, twenty-fourth, twenty-fifth, and twenty- sixth enactments of this act, the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2024.”

§ 24.2-233.
(Effective January 1, 2024) Removal of elected and certain appointed officers by courts.

Upon petition, a circuit court may remove from office any elected officer or officer who has been appointed to fill an elective office, residing within the jurisdiction of the court:

For neglect of duty, misuse of office, or incompetence in the performance of duties when that neglect of duty, misuse of office, or incompetence in the performance of duties has a material adverse effect upon the conduct of the office;

Upon conviction of a misdemeanor pursuant to Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) or Article 1.1 (§

18.2-265.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 and after all rights of appeal have terminated involving the:

Manufacture, sale, gift, distribution, or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, give, or distribute a controlled substance;

Sale, possession with intent to sell, or placing an advertisement for the purpose of selling drug paraphernalia; or

Possession of any controlled substance and such conviction under subdivision a, b, or c has a material adverse effect upon the conduct of such office;

Upon conviction, and after all rights of appeal have terminated, of a misdemeanor involving a “hate crime” as that term is defined in §

52-8.5

when the conviction has a material adverse effect upon the conduct of such office; or

Upon conviction, and after all rights of appeal have terminated, of sexual battery in violation of §

18.2-67.4

, attempted sexual battery in violation of subsection C of §

18.2-67.5

, peeping or spying into dwelling or enclosure in violation of §

18.2-130

, consensual sexual intercourse with a child 15 years of age or older in violation of §

18.2-371

, or indecent exposure of himself or procuring another to expose himself in violation of §

18.2-387

, and such conviction has a material adverse effect upon the conduct of such office.The petition must be signed by a number of registered voters who reside within the jurisdiction of the officer equal to 10 percent of the total number of votes cast at the last election for the office that the officer holds.Any person removed from office under the provisions of subdivision 2, 3, or 4 may not be subsequently subject to the provisions of this section for the same criminal offense.

History.

1975, cc. 515, 595, § 24.1-79.5; 1989, c. 470; 1993, c. 641; 2002, cc. 588, 623; 2011, cc. 384, 410; 2014, cc. 566, 674, 719; 2021 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2024. For the version of this section effective until January 1, 2024, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

24.2-233

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and
551, cl. 4 provides: “4. That, except as provided in the fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth, ninth, tenth, eleventh, twelfth, thirteenth, fourteenth, fifteenth, sixteenth, seventeenth, eighteenth, nineteenth, twentieth, twenty-first, twenty-second, twenty-third, twenty-fourth, twenty-fifth, and twenty-sixth enactments of this act, the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2024.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and
551, cl. 7 provides: “7. That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 ( §

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act,
§§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 ( §

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act,
§§

15.2-1627

,
16.1-69.48:1,
16.1-228,
16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act,
§§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and
§

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of
§

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of
§§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and
551, cl. 9 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment amending
§§

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

, and

19.2-392.4

of the Code of Virginia and creating
§§

19.2-392.2:1

and

19.2-392.2:2

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on the earlier of (i) the first day of the fourth month following notification to the Chairman of the Virginia Code Commission and the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice by the Superintendent of State Police that the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the Department of State Police, and any circuit court clerk who maintains a case management system that interfaces with the Department of State Police under subsection B of
§

17.1-502

of the Code of Virginia have automated systems to exchange information as required by
§

19.2-392.2:1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (ii) July 1, 2025. The Department of State Police shall first transmit the list required under subsection B of
§ 19.2-392.2:1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than the earlier of (a) the first day of the third month following the effective date of
§§

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

, and

19.2-392.4

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and
§§ 19.2-392.2:1 and

19.2-392.2:2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) October 1, 2025. The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the Department of State Police, and any circuit court clerk who maintains a case management system that interfaces with the Department of State Police under subsection B of
§

17.1-502

of the Code of Virginia, shall automate systems to exchange information as required by
§§ 19.2-392.2:1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than July 1, 2025. If the provisions of this act repealing
§

18.2-248.1

of the Code of Virginia are not reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly, the references to
§

18.2-248.1

in
§§ 19.2-392.2:1 and
19.2-392.2:2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall not become effective.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and
551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, effective January 1, 2024, are identical, and in subdivision 2 a at the end and in subdivision 2 c following “substance,” deleted “or marijuana”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 24.2-234.
Removal of officer appointed for a term certain.

Any officer appointed to an office for a term established by law may be removed from office, under the provisions of §

24.2-233

, upon a petition filed with the circuit court in whose jurisdiction the officer resides signed by the person or a majority of the members of the authority who appointed him, if the appointing person or authority is not given the unqualified power of removal.

The circuit court also shall proceed pursuant to §

24.2-235

for the removal of a member of a local electoral board or general registrar upon a petition signed by a majority of the members of the State Board of Elections as provided in §

24.2-103

.

History.

1975, cc. 515, 595, § 24.1-79.6; 1993, c. 641; 2004, cc. 27, 391.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 27 and 391, cl. 2 provides: “That the terms of office of general registrars serving on the effective date of this act shall be extended to midnight June 30, 2007.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 27 and 391 are identical, and divided the former section into the present first and second paragraphs and rewrote the last sentence, which formerly read: “In the case of a member of a county or city electoral board, the circuit court also shall proceed for removal of a member pursuant to §

24.2-235

upon a petition signed by a majority of the members of the State Board of Elections.”

§ 24.2-235.
Procedure.

A petition for the removal of an officer shall state with reasonable accuracy and detail the grounds or reasons for removal and shall be signed by the person or persons making it under penalties of perjury. The circuit court shall not dismiss the petition solely because of an error or omission in the form of the petition relating to its statement of the grounds or reasons for removal if such error or omission is not material in determining whether the statement of the grounds or reasons for removal provides a reasonable basis under §

24.2-233

to consider the removal of the officer.

As soon as the petition is filed with the court, the court shall issue a rule requiring the officer to show cause why he should not be removed from office, the rule alleging in general terms the cause or causes for such removal. The rule shall be returnable in not less than five nor more than ten days and shall be served upon the officer with a copy of the petition. Upon return of the rule duly executed, unless good cause is shown for a continuance or postponement to a later day in the term, the case shall be tried on the day named in the rule and take precedence over all other cases on the docket. If upon trial it is determined that the officer is subject to removal under the provisions of §

24.2-233

, he shall be removed from office.

History.

1975, cc. 515, 595, § 24.1-79.7; 1993, c. 641; 2009, cc. 868, 876.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 868 and 876 are identical, and added the present last sentence of the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

§ 24.2-236.
Suspension from office pending hearing and appeal.

In the event of a judicial proceeding under §

24.2-231

,

24.2-232

,

24.2-233

, or

24.2-234

, the circuit court may enter an order suspending the officer pending the hearing. Any officer convicted of a felony under the laws of any state or the United States shall be automatically suspended upon such conviction, regardless of any appeals, pleadings, delays, or motions. The court may, in its discretion, continue the suspension until the matter is finally disposed of in the Supreme Court or otherwise. During the suspension the court may appoint some suitable person to act in the officer’s place. The officer’s compensation shall be withheld and kept in a separate account and paid to him if and when the judicial proceedings result in his favor. Otherwise, it shall be paid back to the county, city, town, or State Treasurer who paid it.

History.

1975, cc. 515, 595, § 24.1-79.8; 1993, c. 641; 2017, cc. 354, 369.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 354 and 369 are identical, effective March 13, 2017, added the second sentence, and made minor stylistic changes.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Procedure. —

Dismissal of a suspension action filed against a treasurer was improper because the procedure statute did not apply to only citizen initiated proceedings. In re Burfoot, 95 Va. Cir. 194, 2017 Va. Cir. LEXIS 24 (Norfolk Feb. 17, 2017).

Ripeness. —

Plain meaning of this statute postpones forfeiture of office during the pendency of appeals only for convictions under the laws of Virginia; the postponement provision does not apply to a conviction under the laws of the United States. Therefore, an argument that a suspension petition was not ripe because there was no “conviction” until a sentence was imposed and a judgment was entered was rejected where a treasurer had been convicted of federal crimes. In re Burfoot, 95 Va. Cir. 194, 2017 Va. Cir. LEXIS 24 (Norfolk Feb. 17, 2017).

Salary. —

In a case where a treasurer was suspended after his conviction for six felonies, it was determined that it was appropriate to place the salary he earned during this time in a separate account; not doing this would have caused a further erosion of trust since the treasurer had been convicted of crimes of dishonesty. In re Burfoot, 95 Va. Cir. 194, 2017 Va. Cir. LEXIS 24 (Norfolk Feb. 17, 2017).

§ 24.2-237.
Who to represent Commonwealth; trial by jury; appeal.

The attorney for the Commonwealth shall represent the Commonwealth in any trial under this article. If the proceeding is against the attorney for the Commonwealth, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the Commonwealth. Any officer proceeded against shall have the right to demand a trial by jury. The Commonwealth and the defendant shall each have the right to appeal to the Court of Appeals upon the record made in the trial court and the Court of Appeals shall consider and determine such cases.

History.

1975, cc. 515, 595, § 24.1-79.9; 1993, c. 641; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “appeal to the Court of Appeals upon the record made in the trial court and the Court of Appeals shall consider” for “apply to the Supreme Court for a writ of error and supersedeas upon the record made in the trial court and the Supreme Court may hear.”

§ 24.2-238.
Costs.

If a judicial proceeding under this article is dismissed in favor of the respondent, the court in its discretion may require the state agency or political subdivision which the respondent serves to pay court costs or reasonable attorney fees, or both, for the respondent.

No person who signs a petition for the removal of an official pursuant to §

24.2-233

or who circulates such a petition (i) shall be liable for any costs associated with removal proceedings conducted pursuant to the petition, including attorney fees incurred by any other party or court costs, or (ii) shall have sanctions imposed against him pursuant to §

8.01-271.1

.

History.

1975, cc. 515, 595, § 24.1-79.10; 1993, c. 641; 2009, cc. 868, 876.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 868 and 876 are identical, and designated the former provisions of the section as subsection A and added subsection B.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Fees awarded. —

Defendant was entitled to attorney fees and costs explicitly provided that no one who signed a petition for the removal of an official shall be liable for costs, an award of reasonable attorney fees was appropriate since the petition at issue was not under oath, the services were valuable to the client as he no longer had a petition for removal against him, no expert testimony was offered, the hourly rates involved were those generally charged for similar services for lawyers and paralegals of the experience of those involved, but the number of hours charged was not consistent with those generally charged for similar services. Commonwealth v. Orndorff, 104 Va. Cir. 94, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 64 (Shenandoah County Jan. 3, 2020).